Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Revisor’s notes. —

The provisions of this title were redrafted in 1986 to remove personal pronouns pursuant to § 4, ch. 58, SLA 1982 and in 1986, 1994, 2006, and 2014 to make other, minor word changes. In 1980, the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code formerly set out in AS 45.05, were renumbered as AS 45.01 — AS 45.09 so that the numbering now corresponds to the numbering of the official text of the Uniform Commercial Code. To determine the disposition of sections formerly numbered within AS 45.05, or to determine the prior numbering of sections now numbered within AS 45.01 — AS 45.09, see the Table of Sections Amended, Etc., in Volume 11.

Collateral references. —

Theodore Eisenberg, Debtor-Creditor Law (Matthew Bender).

Peter J. Bestos, Modern UCC Litigation Forms (Matthew Bender).

Duesenberg and King, Sales and Bulk Transfers Under the UCC (Matthew Bender).

Cohen, McLaughlin, and Zaretsky, Commercial Law Report (Matthew Bender).

Frederick M. Hart, Forms and Procedures Under the UCC (Matthew Bender).

Willer and Hart, UCC Reporter-Digest (Matthew Bender).

Zaretsky, McLaughlin, Commercial Law and Practice Guide (Matthew Bender).

Charles L. Knapp, Commercial Damages: A Guide to Remedies in Business Litigation (Matthew Bender).

Charles K. Knapp, Commercial Damages Reporter (Matthew Bender).

Howard Ruda, Asset Based Financing: A Transactional Guide (Matthew Bender).